<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR891005-0007 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.10-05-89.f2.A1006</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="94"><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="50">COMMODITY FUTURES TRADING COMMISSION</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">17 CFR Parts 1, 3, 31, 145, and 147</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Leverage Transactions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Commodity Futures Trading Commission.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rules.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Commodity Futures Trading Commission (``Commission'')has amended its rules relating to leverage transactions to permit additionalparticipation in the leverage business, as directed by Congress in section19(c)(2) of the Commodity Exchange Act (``Act''). Futures Trading Act of1986, Pub. L. No. 99-641, andSection; 109, 100 Stat. 3556 (1986). The substanceof the current regulatory framework has been retained. Most of the ruleamendments and the few new rules are of a procedural nature and are designedto provide for a regulatory structure of direct supervision by a registeredfutures association under Commission oversight. Such a structure is consistentwith the other regulatory programs administered by the Commission underthe Commodity Exchange Act. The rule amendments and new rules have beenadopted essentially as proposed, with certain minor change noted below.Each leverage transaction merchant (``LTM'') is required to be a memberof a registered futures association, and a registered futures associationwith LTM members is required to adopt rules establishing minimum financial,cover, segregation and sales practice requirements, and related reportingrequirements. With respect to each area, these rules must be at least asstringent as the Commission's standards set forth in Part 31 of the rulespromulgated under the Act. Such a registered futures association also wouldbe required to have an arbitration procedure to settle leverage customerclaims or grievances. The Commission has separately approved such rulesof the National Futures Association (``NFA''), the only registered futuresassociation.The Commission previously authorized NFA to perform the function of processingthe registration of LTMs and associated persons (``APs'') of LTMs. TheCommission is now authorizing NFA to conduct proceedings to deny, condition,suspend, restrict or revoke the registration of any LTM or AP of an LTM,or an applicant for registration in either category, and to process a requestfor withdrawal from registration by an LTM.LTMs must file monthly reports of leverage contract trading volume andpricing, and quarterly reports of closed-out leverage contracts, with NFAinstead of with the Commission. NFA will prepare summaries of those reportsfor the Commission.The specific exemption procedure currently set forth in Rule 31.24 hasbeen deleted, and the provisions of exemptions previously granted underRule 31.24 to the existing LTMs which are of general applicability havebeen incorporated into the rules as appropriate. The only major functionwith respect to leverage contracts for which the Commission retains soleauthority is the registration of leverage commodities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>January 1, 1990.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Lawrence B. Patent, AssociateChief Counsel, Division of Trading and Markets, Commodity Futures TradingCommission, 2033 K Street NW., Washington, DC 20581, telephone (202) 254-8955;David R. Merrill, Senior Assistant General Counsel, Office of the GeneralCounsel, Commodity Futures Trading Commission, 2033 K Street NW., Washington,DC 20581, telephone (202) 254-9880; or Paul M. Architzel, Chief Counsel,Division of Economic Analysis, Commodity Futures Trading Commission, 2033K Street NW., Washington, DC 20581, telephone (202) 254-6990.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Paperwork Reduction Act Notice</ITAG>The annual public reporting burden for this collection of information isestimated to average 49 hours per LTM, including the time for reviewinginstructions, searching existing data sources, gathering and maintainingthe data needed, and completing and reviewing the collection of information.This includes the time necessary to maintain the various records and toprepare and file the appropriate reports required by the Part 31 rulespromulgated under the Act. Of course, this burden will vary from firm tofirm based on the number of leverage contracts offered and sold, the numberof employees, the firm's financial condition and other factors. Send commentsregarding this burden estimate or any other aspect of this collection ofinformation, including suggestions for reducing this burden, to JosephG. Salazar, CFTC Clearance Officer, 2033 K Street NW., Washington, DC 20581;and to Office of Management and Budget, Paperwork Reduction Project (3038-0029),Washington, DC 20503.<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Background</ITAG>The Commission published its proposed rule amendments with respect to leveragetransactions and allowed sixty days for public comment thereon. 54 FR 3476(January 24, 1989). The Commission received nine written comments on theproposals. The commenters included the U.S. Department of Justice, NFA,two registered LTMs (one of which submitted two written comments), threecontract markets and a private attorney. The Commission has carefully consideredeach of the comments and has determined to adopt the rule amendments andnew rules essentially as proposed, with certain minor changes noted below.The Commission previously adopted rule amendments providing for the transferto NFA of the function of processing the registration of LTMs and APs ofLTMs. 54 FR 19556 (May 8, 1989). The Commission authorized NFA to performthis function effective May 15, 1989. 54 FR 19594 (May 8, 1989). The Commissionis now amending Rule 3.33 regarding withdrawal from registration. The Commissionalso has issued an Order that authorizes NFA to process registration withdrawalrequests made by LTMs, and authorizes NFA to conduct proceedings to deny,condition, suspend, restrict or revoke the registration of any LTM or APof an LTM, or an applicant for registration in either category, which ispublished elsewhere in the ``Notices'' Section of this issue.<ITAG tagnum="84">III. Rule Amendments and Comments Thereon</ITAG>A. Moratoria RulesThe Commission proposed to delete Rules 31.1 and 31.2 (17 CFR 31.1 and31.2 (1988)), which imposed moratoria on the entry of new firms into theleverage business unless a firm was so engaged on June 1, 1978 (with respectto leverage contracts involving gold and silver bullion and bulk coins)or February 2, 1979 (with respect to leverage contracts involving all othercommodities upon which leverage contracts could have been offered at thattime, <T3>i.e., </T3>all but the agricultural commodities enumerated in the Act),respectively. Other provisions of the rules which related to the moratoriaand their treatment of ``grandfathered'' firms, <T3>i.e., </T3>those firms which were engaged in a leverage business onthe dates specified in the moratoria rules, also were proposed to be deleted.These provisions include paragraphs (c), (d) and (e) of Rule 31.5 and paragraphs(a)(1) and (b)(1) of Rule 31.6, as well as Rule 31.22. The Commission intendedby these proposals to conform the regulatory framework for an applicantfor registration as an LTM or an AP of an LTM to the framework for anyother applicant for registration. Such applicant would not be permittedto engage in business requiring registration until registration had beengranted.One commenter suggested that the Commission may wish to consider a gradualend to the moratoria, which the Act permits, particularly if there is uncertaintyabout the number of firms that would enter the leverage business. Thiscommenter suggested that a higher capital requirement for LTMs could beimposed temporarily to accomplish a gradual end to the moratoria. The Commissionhas carefully considered this comment, but it has determined that changingthe minimum adjusted net capital requirement is not appropriate at thistime. Accordingly, the rule amendments referred to in the preceding paragraphrelating to the moratoria and ``grandfathered'' firms have been adoptedas proposed.B. Status of Copper and Foreign Currency Leverage ContractsThe amendments to section 19 of the Commodity Exchange Act enacted by Congressin 1986 made it unlawful for any person to offer to enter into, to enterinto, or to confirm the execution of, any leverage contract to or witha leverage customer involving any leverage commodity other than gold andsilver bullion, bulk gold and silver coins and platinum. These amendmentshad the effect of prohibiting new leverage contracts involving copper,which had been offered by International Precious Metals Corporation (``IPMC''),and four foreign currencies (British pound, Deutsche mark, Japanese yenand Swiss franc), which had been offered by Monex International, Ltd. (``Monex''),on and after the date of enactment of the Futures Trading Act of 1986,November 10, 1986. Congress also provided that its ban on new copper andforeign currency leverage contracts did not affect any rights or obligationsarising out of any leverage contract involving any of those commoditiesthat was entered into prior to November 10, 1986. The Commission sent lettersto IPMC and Monex in November 1986 to inform them of these amendments tothe law and to remind them of their obligations to service leverage contractsinvolving copper and foreign currencies, respectively, entered into priorto November 10, 1986, including providing cover for such open contracts.The Commission proposed to codify the statutory provision and its November1986 letter to IPMC and Monex in a new paragraph 31.5(c). The only commenterwho addressed these proposed amendments favored them, and the Commissionhas adopted the amendments as proposed.Because of the reference to November 10, 1986 in that provision, the Commissionalso proposed to make technical amendments to the introductory text ofparagraph (a) and to paragraph (b) of Rule 31.5 to make clear that thecurrent reference to the ``effective date of this section'' meant the <T3>original</T3> effective date of the section, April 13, 1984. <T3>See also </T3>Rules 31.13(b)(2) and 31.21. There were no comments onthese technical amendments, and the Commission has adopted them as proposed.Another proposed technical amendment to Rule 31.5 was the deletion of paragraph(g), which related to the denial, suspension or revocation of registrationof an LTM or an AP of an LTM. The Commission adopted subpart C of part3 of its rules, which applies to the denial, suspension or revocation ofregistration for all registrants, subsequent to the adoption of the leveragecontract rules in 1984. Because of that and in light of the Commission'sauthorizing NFA to take adverse action with respect to LTMs and APs ofLTMs as noted above, the Commission has deleted Rule 31.5(g).C. DefinitionsThe Commission proposed to amend the definition of ``leverage commodity''in Rule 31.4(g), which currently includes references to copper and fourforeign currencies.\1\<NOTE/> IPMC closed out its last copper leverage contract in November1987, and Monex closed out its last foreign currency leverage contractin August 1988. The proposed amendment to the leverage commodity definitionwas intended to reflect the amendment to section 19 of the Act limitingthe offer and sale of leverage contracts to those involving gold and silverbullion, bulk gold and silver coins and platinum. The Commission also indicatedwhen it proposed these rule amendments that it had reviewed all of theother definitions in Rule 31.4 and believed that changes thereto were neithernecessary nor appropriate.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ The Commission also proposed to delete the reference toleverage contracts on foreign currencies in Rule 31.25(b), which governsthe treatment of carrying charges.One commenter addressed the definitions applicable to leverage transactions.This commenter approved the deletion of reference to copper and foreigncurrencies. However, this commenter would make certain further definitionalchanges and would generally eliminate the use of futures terminology withrespect of leverage contracts, specifically referring to such terms as``long'' and ``repurchase.'' This commenter also recommended amending Rule31.4(t) which defines leverage account equity. The commenter believes thatthe definition should be amended so that leverage contract equity is basedon the cash price series the LTM must designate as a benchmark for useby leverage customers in determining the value of each leverage commodity,rather than relying on the LTM's bid and ask price in computing the valueof long and short leverage contracts as the rule currently requires. Thepurpose of the cash price series is to assist a leverage customer in comparingthe LTM's prices to those in normal cash market channels. However, thevalue of any leverage contract is determined solely by the prices establishedby the LTM, and the Commission therefore believes it is appropriate tomaintain the definition of leverage account equity solely in terms of theLTM's prices. The Commission has carefully considered these comments, hasagain reviewed the definitions in Rule 31.4, and has determined to adoptthe amendment to Rule 31.4 as proposed.D. Leverage Commodity Registration The Commission, as proposed, has retained for itself the function of processingapplications for and granting leverage commodity registration under Rule31.6. This is the only function which the Commission has reserved completelyto itself at this time. However, the Commission also indicated when itproposed these rule amendments that as experience is gained and leveragecommodity registration becomes more standardized, it would consider amendingthe rules to authorize NFA to register leverage commodities.The Commission also proposed to add a new paragraph (a)(6) to Rule 31.6which would provide an additional condition for leverage commodity registration.This additional condition would be that the leverage contracts based onthe leverage commodity do not include substantial characteristics of otherinterests such as options, certificates of deposit or other regulated instruments.The Commission required an extended period of time to resolve two leveragecommodity registration applications, which were subsequently withdrawn,because the leverage contracts contained an option component. One commenter supported the Commission's proposal in this area. Anothercommenter opposed this proposal, arguing that ``there is nothing in thehistory of the Act that even implies that a leverage contract may not haveelements of another commodity interest.'' This commenter also stated that``if a leverage contract is submitted to the CFTC for approval which containsan option component, the Commission should judge that submission on itscompliance with the Commission's leverage and option rules.'' A third commenterdisputed the implication that the Commission has the legal authority topermit off-exchange trading of hybrid leverage commodities. This commenterfurther stated that if the Commission were granted legal authority to considersuch applications, the prevailing requirements for contract market designationshould be used to evaluate such applications. The Commission has carefully considered these comments and has determinedto add a new paragraph (a)(6) to Rule 31.6 as proposed. As the Commissionnoted when it proposed the ban on leverage contracts with substantial characteristicsof other interests such as options, certificates of deposit or other regulatedinstruments, such instruments may be extremely complex and may raise additionalissues regarding customer protection. Moreover, such hybrid leverage instrumentsare not readily included under the present regulatory program, and mayraise other legal issues. As noted above, the cross-references to current Rule 31.5(c) ``grandfathered''LTMs have been deleted from paragraphs (a)(1) and (b)(1) of Rule 31.6.No leverage commodity registration will be granted to a person that isnot a registered LTM. The Commission will endeavor to coordinate with NFAso that the first leverage commodity registration will be granted simultaneouslywith the granting of registration as an LTM.2<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\ The current fee for processing a leverage commodity registrationapplication is $4,500.One commenter recommended that all leverage commodity registration applicationsbe published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> for comment. The Commission has not previouslydone this with leverage commodity registration applications and does notbelieve that such a requirement is warranted. This commenter made another point with respect to Rule 31.6 which was notraised in the Commission's proposed rule amendments but was discussed inthe Commission's November 1988 report to Congress on leverage transactions,which was mandated by the Futures Trading Act of 1986. The issue is whetherleverage contracts should be subject to an economic purpose test. The commenterpointed out that the Commission stated on page 18 of its report to Congress``that an `economic purpose' test is not included <T3>in the Act </T3>as a condition for leverage commodity registration.''[Emphasis by the commenter.] The commenter expressed strenuous disagreementwith that statement if it was meant to imply that the Commission lacksthe authority to impose an economic purpose test for leverage contractsby rule. The commenter stated that Congress' request for findings and recommendationsas to whether leverage contracts serve an economic purpose in the mandatedreport referred to above indicates Congress expected that question to beaddressed in the rules relating to leverage transactions.The commenter also raised the issue of regulatory parity, arguing thatif an economic purpose test is necessary for either futures or leveragecontracts, it is only fair to impose such a test on both types of contracts.This could be done, according to the commenter, by adding a new provisionto Rule 31.6(a), or by interpreting Rule 31.6(a)(5) to require leveragecontracts to meet an economic purpose test. The commenter pointed out thatRule 31.6(a)(5) currently requires that leverage contract terms and conditionsnot be contrary to the public interest, which tracks the language of section5(g) of the Act, the basis for the economic purpose test for futures contracts.Conversely, the commenter stated that if the Commission is prepared toallow the market to determine whether leverage contracts serve an economicpurpose, fairness demands that contract markets be afforded the same freedomfor a new futures contract and not be subjected to meeting the economicpurpose test before designation is granted. The commenter stated that thiscould be done by deleting the economic purpose test from the Commission'sGuideline No. 1 concerning economic and public interest requirements forcontract market designations.The Commission has carefully reviewed the comments with respect to whetherleverage contracts should be subject to an economic purpose test. The Commissionbelieves that it has thoroughly addressed that issue in pages 16-21 ofthe mandated report to Congress referred to above. The Commission notesthat the regulatory framework for leverage transactions has never includedan economic purpose test. The Commission further notes that during eachof its previous reauthorizations by Congress, the issue of leverage transactionshas been discussed extensively and Congress has enacted statutory changesregarding leverage transactions on each occasion. However, Congress hasnever mandated that leverage contracts be subject to an economic purposetest. It is well established that when Congress revisits a statute givingrise to a longstanding agency interpretation without pertinent change,the failure to repeal or revise the interpretation, or to mandate an alternativerequirement, is persuasive evidence that the agency interpretation is theone intended by Congress. <T3>See Commodity Futures Trading Commission </T3>v. <T3>Schor, </T3>478 U.S. 833, 846 (1986).Congress did state that revised leverage transaction rules shall providefor permitting additional persons to engage in such transactions, whichthese rules do, and may authorize or require, notwithstanding any otherprovision of law, a futures association registered under the Act to performsuch responsibilities in connection with such transactions as the Commissionmay specify, which these rules and related orders also accomplish.\3\<NOTE/> The only other references in section 19 of the Act to theCommission's rules relating to leverage transactions are the general provisionscontained in the Act prior to the 1986 amendments, <T3>i.e., </T3>the rules should be designed to ensure the financial solvencyof leverage transactions and prevent manipulation or fraud, such rulescan be adopted only after notice and opportunity for hearing, and the Commissionmay set different terms and conditions for transactions involving differentcommodities. The Commission has responded by repealing the moratoria onthe entry of new firms into the leverage business, providing for a structureof direct self-regulation by a registered futures association under Commissionoversight in all areas other than leverage commodity registration, andotherwise generally maintaining the regulatory structure currently in place.The Commission further notes that it transmitted the mandated report onleverage transactions to Congress in November 1988 as required and thatthe report contained the aforementioned discussion of economic purposeand the amendments to the leverage transaction rules and certain new rulesas they were subsequently proposed. There was no rule amendment or newrule contained in that report that would subject leverage contracts toan economic purpose test. The Commission received no comment from Congresson the issue. Accordingly, the Commission believes that it is appropriateto maintain the rules relating to leverage contracts without an economicpurpose test for leverage contracts.\4\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\ Congress also provided that the Commission may requirethat permission for additional persons to engage in the leverage businessbe given on a gradual basis so as not to place an undue burden on the Commission'sresources. As discussed above, the Commission has not adopted any formalmechanism in this regard. We note, however, that the administration ofany registration system normally results in certain applicants being grantedregistration before others.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\4\ The Commission does not express an opinion as to whetherit could adopt such a rule under the broad rulemaking authority of section19 of the Act.E. Financial Early Warning SystemThe Commission, as proposed, has amended Rule 31.7(c) to delete the exceptionthat persons who have applied for registration as LTMs are not requiredto send early warning notices to NFA. Such applicants must send such noticesto NFA since NFA, and not the Commission, will be processing applicationsfor registration as an LTM. However, an LTM or an applicant for registrationas an LTM must file financial early warning notices with the Commissionalso. Futures commission merchants (``FCMs'') and introducing brokers (``IBs''),and applicants for registration in either category, must do so under Rule1.12 (17 CFR 1.12 (1988)), the relevant provisions of which are incorporatedby reference in Rule 31.7(c). Paragraphs (a) and (b) of Rule 31.7 alreadycontain references to the capital, cover and segregation rules of a designatedself-regulatory organization (``DSRO''), and these provisions will becomeoperative under the Commission's regulatory framework for an expanded leveragebusiness which is set forth herein. The Commission received no commentson this aspect of its proposals.F. Cover and Segregation of Customer FundsThe Commission proposed to maintain the basic cover requirements as theyexist under the current rules. Under these requirements, at least 90 percentof the amount of physical commodities subject to open long leverage contractsand, separately, at least 90 percent of the amount of physical commoditiessubject to open short leverage contracts, must be covered by the LTM. Inaddition, at least 25 percent of the amount of physical commodities subjectto open long leverage contracts must be covered with physicals. Such physicalcover may be subject to a loan not exceeding 70 percent of current marketvalue.One commenter asserted that cover is too lenient in the current rules,and stated that only unencumbered warehouse receipts should be allowedas good cover. This commenter also objected to the current rules permittingmetal ingots to be treated as good cover for leverage contracts involvingcoins. The commenter further stated that LTMs should be required to maintain100 percent cover rather that 90 percent, arguing that a high net capitalrequirement is not very effective without requiring full cover by an LTMand a stricter definition of what constitutes good cover. The Commissionhas carefully considered the basic cover requirement in light of thesecomments and its experience administering these rules, and has determinedto maintain the basic cover requirements as currently in effect.The Commission remains concerned about cover being held outside of theUnited States, and therefore, as indicated in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> release proposing these amendments, it will retainthe requirement that permissible cover consisting of futures contractsor commodity options be limited to those futures contracts or commodityoptions which are traded on or subject to the rules of a contract market.\5\<NOTE/> Although the Commission has adopted rules to govern foreignfutures and option transactions (52 FR 28980 (August 5, 1987), most ofwhich are codified at 17 CFR Part 30 (1988)), foreign futures or foreignoptions do <T3>not</T3> constitute permissible cover for leverage contracts and theCommission has not amended Rule 31.8 in that area. No comments were receivedon this issue.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\5\ <T3>See also</T3> Rule 31.12(a)(2) (17 CFR 31.12 (a)(2) (1988)), whichrequires leverage customer funds to be kept in the United States.The Commission proposed three substantive amendments to its cover requirementsto incorporate the provisions of exemptions granted to the current LTMs.The first proposal was to amend Rule 31.8(a)(2)(ii) to provide that permissiblecover could also include one type of bulk gold coins for leverage contractsinvolving another type of bulk gold coins on an ounce-for-ounce basis ifeach type of bulk gold coins used as cover is the subject of a leveragecontract offered by the LTM. Similar treatment also would be allowed fordifferent types of bulk silver coins. The commenter that asserted coveris too lenient in the current rules also opposed the Commission's proposalsto codify the previously-granted exemptions with respect to cover. TheCommission has carefully considered this comment and has determined toadopt the amendment to Rule 31.8(a)(2)(ii) as proposed. As noted above,this is consistent with current Commission policy as set forth in exemptionsgranted to the current LTMs. Further, the Commission's cover rules currentlypermit bullion to be used as cover for leverage contracts involving bulkcoins and vice versa (which, as indicated above, the commenter also opposes).Since the bulk coins are valued based upon their metallic content ratherthan their numismatic value, the Commission believes that it is appropriateto allow some fungibility between bullion and bulk coins for cover purposes.The Commission also proposed to codify two other exemptions which havebeen granted with respect to permissible physical cover for long leveragecontracts. One of these additional forms of permissible physical coverof a long leverage contract is the purchase of the leverage commodity subjectto the leverage contract under a two-day settlement procedure, which isthe normal cash market procedure. The LTM is considered covered from thetime the purchase order is confirmed, even though the LTM does not getpossession or control of a warehouse receipt until settlement on the secondfollowing business day. Such a purchase could not be made from an affiliatedfirm of the LTM. As noted above, one commenter opposed codification ofthis previously-granted exemption. One commenter supported the Commission'sproposal in this area and suggested that it be extended to the rules regardingsegregation of customer funds. This commenter urged that the rules be amendedto provide that an LTM may sell metal or coins from the pool of segregatedassets and be able to count the receivable from its counterparty to thesale as a good asset for segregated funds purposes while it is awaitingtransfer of the proceeds of the sale from the counterparty.The Commission has carefully considered these comments and has determinedto codify the previously-granted exemption to the cover rules as proposedbut not to extend similar treatment with respect to the rules relatingto segregation of leverage customer funds. The Commission believes thatthis distinction is warranted because the cover requirements are intendedin part to assure sufficient physical goods are available to satisfy customerdemands for delivery (which generally arise in less than ten percent ofpurchased leverage contracts) and the segregation of funds rules are intendedto assure that at every moment an LTM can satisfy its obligations to allof its customers. Therefore, while only 90 percent of leverage contractsby commodity volume must be covered (and only 25 percent of the total mustbe in physicals), 100 percent of segregation requirements must be maintainedat all times. Further, permissible physical cover can include warehousereceipts encumbered up to 70 percent, but leverage customer funds can onlybe used to purchase warehouse receipts that are unencumbered. The Commissionhas maintained a somewhat stricter regulatory framework for treatment ofleverage customer funds as compared to cover requirements, and the Commissionbelieves that the codification of the exemption to allow purchases of metalor coins under a two-day settlement procedure to be considered good covershould not be extended to the rules regarding segregation of leverage customerfunds.The other additional form of permissible physical cover of a long leveragecontract which the Commission proposed to allow is a long spot futurescontract on the leverage commodity subject to the leverage contract, ifthe LTM has stopped a non-transferable delivery notice with respect tothat futures contract and has otherwise complied with any procedures, includingpayment, necessary for taking delivery. If those conditions are met, theLTM would be considered to have covered his commitments to leverage customerswith physical cover, even though the LTM does not have possession or controlof a warehouse receipt for two business days. The Commission notes thatsimply holding a spot futures position is considered to be futures coverrather than physical cover, since the futures position could be liquidatedby an offsetting transaction prior to the beginning of the delivery process.The Commission received no comments on this proposal, other than the commentreferred to above which opposed codification of any of the exemptions relatedto cover, and the Commission has determined to adopt this amendment asproposed.In the cases referred to in the three preceding paragraphs, the alternativeforms of cover set forth in paragraph (a)(2)(ii) (bullion for coins andvice versa, as well as certain cross-coin cover) will be allowed, and theLTM must maintain records of the transactions subject to inspection, copyingand audit by the Commission and a DSRO. The Commission, as proposed, hasalso limited the amount of cover which could consist of purchases undera two-day settlement procedure or spot futures contracts on which a deliverynotice has been stopped to 10 percent of the LTM's obligations on longleverage contracts in each case. One commenter opposed these limits, statingthat there could be market conditions that force an LTM to cover solelywith physicals and that such conditions probably would coincide with heavybuying and/or selling by customers. The Commission has carefully consideredthis comment, but based upon its experience in administering the leveragetransaction rules, it believes the limits adopted are appropriate.As noted, the Commission has previously granted exemptions in these areasso these new provisions of the cover rule, Rule 31.8, are consistent withexisting Commission policy. These codifications appear as new paragraphs(a)(2)(iii) and (a)(2)(iv) of Rule 31.8. The current paragraph (a)(2)(iii),which contains the permissible futures cover for long leverage contracts,has been redesignated as paragraph (a)(2)(v).The Commission has also adopted, as proposed, two technical amendmentsto the cover rule. Paragraph (b) has been amended to provide that a DSROcan take action against a member LTM for not maintaining adequate coverin accordance with the DRSO's rules. Paragraph (e) has been amended toinclude a specific reference to Rule 31.28, which is the new rule thatrequires any self-regulatory organization with member LTMs to adopt andenforce minimum cover requirements for its member LTMs at least as stringentas those of the Commission.\6\<NOTE/> No comments were received on these technical amendments.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\6\ A similar amendment has been adopted as a new Rule 31.12(h)regarding segregation rules of a self-regulatory organization. That isthe only amendment of Rule 31.12.G. Minimum Financial and Related ReportingRequirementsThe only amendments which the Commission proposed to Rule 31.9, the minimumcapital requirements for an LTM, are of a procedural nature. Paragraph(a)(2) of Rule 31.9 was proposed to be amended in a manner similar to theproposed amendment to Rule 31.8(e) discussed in the preceding paragraph.The amendment includes a specific reference to Rule 31.28, which is thenew rule that requires any self-regulatory organization with member LTMsto adopt and enforce minimum financial requirements for its member LTMsthat are at least as stringent as those of the Commission. Paragraph (a)(4)of Rule 31.9 was proposed to be amended in a manner similar to the amendmentto Rule 31.8(b) discussed in the preceding paragraph. The amendment providesthat a DSRO can take action against a member LTM for non-compliance withthe DSRO's minimum financial requirements.The third proposed amendment to Rule 31.9 would make paragraph (d) thereofconform to Rule 1.18 (17 CFR 1.18 (1988)), the comparable provision forFCMs. Rule 31.9(d) requires an LTM or an applicant therefor to make a formalmonthly capital computation. That rule currently requires that the computationbe made available for inspection by any representative of the Commission,the DSRO or the United States Department of Justice. The amendment maintainsthat required availability of the monthly capital computation for an LTM,but an applicant for registration as an LTM is required only to make itsmonthly capital computation available to any representative of NFA, whichhas been authorized to perform the processing of LTM registration applications.54 FR 19556 and 54 FR 19594 (May 8, 1989). The Commission received no commentson these procedural amendments to Rule 31.9, and they have been adoptedas proposed.The Commission has determined to maintain the current $2.5 million minimumadjusted net capital requirement for an LTM. As the Commission noted whenit adopted the rules relating to leverage transactions, ``if an LTM wereto join the existing registered futures association, the National FuturesAssociation, or any other such association which may be established, theLTM's minimum financial requirement or its minimum cover requirement wouldnot necessarily be lowered.'' 49 FR 5498, 5512 (February 13, 1984).The Commission considered whether there should be an adjustment to theLTM capital requirement, but determined not to propose any such adjustmentbased on its regulatory experience and the off-exchange environment inwhich leverage contracts are traded. The Commission believes that any increasein supervision afforded by membership in a self-regulatory organizationdoes not affect the reasons why the Commission set financial requirementsfor an LTM substantially higher than those for an FCM, which were statedas follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">The leverage market is essentially a principals' market, and the purchaserof a leverage contract is solely dependent on the LTM for performance onthe contract. Because leverage contracts are not traded on boards of tradedesignated as contract markets by the Commission, there is no clearingorganization to take the other side of every trade, no FCM guarantee ofvariation margin to the clearing organization and no clearing organizationguaranty fund and assessment power, nor is there any established secondarymarket for leverage contracts.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Because the LTM takes the other side of every leverage contract enteredinto by a leverage customer and because the LTM is the sole guarantor ofperformance on the leverage contract, an LTM may properly be viewed ascomparable to the clearing organization of a contract market.\7\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\7\ 49 FR 5498, 5512. Congress has also recognized the needfor a high net capital requirement for LTMs. Indeed, in proposing the 1982amendments to Section 19 of the Act directing the Commission to promulgateregulations governing leverage transactions, which amendments were adoptedby Congress essentially as proposed, Congressman Glickman stated: ``I thinkthe CFTC has to set regulatory standards and high net capital requirementsto keep bad operators out of business.'' Excerpt from Unofficial Transcriptof Mark-Up Session, Subcommittee on Conservation, Credit and Rural Development,House Committee on Agriculture, at 59, April 1, 1982, with the permissionof Congressman Dan Glickman. <T3>Id</T3>. at n.32.The only comments received on the required minimum level of adjusted netcapital for LTMs have been alluded to above. One commenter considers atightening up of current cover requirements as more important than a highnet capital requirement, but the commenter also stated that ``if anything,the net capital requirement should be even higher.'' Another commentersuggested a higher net capital requirement temporarily as a means to providefor a gradual lifting of the moratoria. The Commission has carefully consideredthese comments, but it believes the required minimum amount of adjustednet capital for LTMs should be maintained at the current level based uponits experience in administering these rules.The latter commenter referred to in the preceding paragraph also recommendedthat the Commission confirm that no LTM capital can be provided by affiliates.Otherwise, according to the commenter, the fundamental integrity of andthe risk of doing business with an LTM would be misrepresented. The Commissionnotes that Rule 31.9(b)(10) currently incorporates by reference the provisionsof Rule 1.17(f), which is the provision governing the treatment of assetsand liabilities of subsidiaries or affiliates of FCMs and IBs. The Commissionbelieves this parity of treatment should be maintained and has determinednot to adopt the recommendation of the commenter which respect to LTM capitalprovided by affiliates.The Commission further notes that Rule 31.9(b)(10) also incorporates byreference Rule 1.17(h) concerning subordinated debt. Rule 1.17(h)(vii)requires the approval of the Commission for prepayment of subordinateddebt by an FCM or an IB. However, by means of a ``no-action'' letter issuedon September 10, 1985, the Commission's Division of Trading and Marketspermits such prepayment by an FCM or an IB upon approval of the DSRO only.[1984-1986 Transfer Binder] Comm. Fut. L. Rep. (CCH) andpara; 22,738. TheCommission hereby confirms that similar treatment will be extended to LTMswith respect to prepayment of subordinated debt.The amendments to the financial reporting requirements in Rule 31.13 arealso of a procedural and conforming nature. As noted above, the referencein the introductory text of paragraph (a) as to where to file an applicationfor registration as an LTM has been changed from the Commission to NFA.Paragraph (b)(2) has been amended to include a specific reference to Rule31.28, for the same reasons that a similar amendment to Rules 31.9(a)(2)and 31.8(e) was adopted. Paragraph (c) has been amended to conform to arecent amendment to Rule 1.16, which is cross-referenced in Rule 31.13(c).<T3>See</T3> 53 FR 4606, 4612 (February 17, 1988).Paragraph (g)(2) of Rule 31.13 has been amended to conform to a recentamendment to Rule 1.10(d)(2)(ii) to accommodate the recently issued FinancialAccounting Standards Board Statement No. 95 which requires companies tofile a statement of cash flows as part of a full set of financial statementsin place of the statement of changes in financial position. <T3>See</T3> 53 FR 4606, 4609, 4611.\8\<NOTE/> Various amendments have also been adopted to paragraphs (j),(k), (l), and (m) of Rule 31.13 to refer to NFA or the DSRO, as appropriate,in lieu of the Commission. Those provisions relate to an LTM's choice offiscal year, extensions of time to file financial reports, and the availabilityof financial reports. No comments were received with respect to Rule 31.13and the amendments thereto have been adopted as proposed.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\8\ Conforming amendments have also been made to Form 2-FR,the basic financial reporting form for LTMs, and to Rules 145.5(d)(1)(i)(H)and 147.3(b)(4)(i)(A)(<T3>8</T3>) so that the statement of cash flows will receive confidentialtreatment to the same extent as the statement of changes in financial position.Other minor, technical changes have been made to Form 2-FR to conform tocertain of the rule amendments discussed herein. Due to the nature of thosechanges, and the fact that Form 2-FR does not appear in the Code of FederalRegulations, the amendments to Form 2-FR are not reproduced here. Anyoneinterested in further information on this aspect of the amendments shouldcontact Mr. Patent at the telephone number listed above.The Commission also wishes to note that since the revised Form 2-FR willhave the Statement of Changes in Ownership Equity, which was previouslyrequired to be filed with interim financial reports and the year-end certifiedreport, and the Statement of Changes in Liabilities Subordinated to theClaims of General Creditors, which was previously only required to be filedwith a certified year-end report, appearing on the same page, the Commissionis requiring that the subordinated liabilities statement also be includedwith interim financial reports. <T3>See</T3> Rule 31.13(f)(3). This conforms the treatment of financialreports for LTMs with the treatment of financial reports for FCMs and IBs,Forms 1-FR-FCM and 1-FR-IB, respectively. 17 CFR 1.10(d)(1)(iii) (1988);<T3>see also</T3> 53 FR 4606, 4608.H. Disclosure and Confirmation StatementsThe Commission proposed certain minor, technical amendments to its disclosurerequirements for an LTM, which are set forth in Rule 31.11, to take accountof the fact that leverage contracts are now limited to those involvinggold and silver bullion, bulk gold and silver coins, and platinum. Thereference to foreign currencies in the first paragraph of the bold-facedrisk disclosure statement has been deleted. The cross-reference to Rule31.4(g) in Rule 31.11(a)(2)(ii) now refers to the revised Rule 31.4(g)(1)-(4).Paragraph (a)(2)(viii) has also been amended to delete the specific referenceto metal or coins in the provision referring to the possible need for aninspection or assay at the customer's expense. The reference to metal orcoins presumed that there would be other types of leverage commodities,such as foreign currencies. Since leverage contracts involving such othertypes of leverage commodities are now prohibited, a specific referenceto metal or coins in Rule 31.11(a)(2)(viii) is unnecessary. The Commissionalso proposed to amend Rule 31.11(e) to require LTMs to file their DisclosureDocuments with NFA for review. A copy of the Disclosure Document also mustbe filed with the Commission, but NFA will perform the review function.No comments were received with respect to these amendments to Rule 31.11,and they have been adopted as proposed.The Commission proposed other amendments to Rule 31.11 intended to codifyexemptions previously granted by the Commission. Rule 31.11(h) was proposedto be amended by adding a proviso that no notification to leverage customersis required if the LTM changes its carrying charge rate by less than onepercent from the rate charged at the prior month-end and the new rate ismade available to leverage customers by means of a toll-free telephonecall and such availability is set forth in the LTM's Disclosure Document.Two commenters pointed out that the exemption granted by the Commissionpermits no direct notification to customers of carrying charge rate changesof one percent or less, and not only when such changes are less than onepercent as the proposed amendment to Rule 31.11(h) stated. The Commissionhas reviewed this matter and has determined to modify its proposal so thatLTMs need not notify leverage customers directly of carrying charge ratechanges of one percent or less compared to the rate charged at the priormonth-end provided the new rate is made available to leverage customersby means of a toll-free telephone call and such availability is set forthin the LTM's Disclosure Document. An LTM must also include notice of allinterest rate changes in the monthly statement to leverage customers. <T3>See</T3> Rule 31.15(b)(4) (17 CFR 31.15(b)(4) (1988)).The other amendments which the Commission proposed to Rule 31.11 are setforth in a new paragraph (m) and codify another exemption granted by theCommission. Rule 31.11(m) allows those LTMs which offer only long leveragecontracts to delete various specific references to short leverage contractsin their Disclosure Documents that are otherwise required by Rule 31.11.\9\<NOTE/> Rule 31.11(m)(2) provides that any LTM using a DisclosureDocument that deletes or disregards references to short leverage contractsmust file a new Disclosure Document meeting all of the requirements ofRule 31.11 at least 30 calendar days before it begins to offer any shortleverage contract. No comments were received on Rule 31.11(m) and it hasbeen adopted as proposed.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\9\ Of the forty-six affirmative respondents to the surveywhich Congress directed the Commission to conduct with the assistance ofa registered futures association regarding interest in entering the leveragebusiness, two respondents indicated that they would offer long leveragecontracts only and ten others reported that they were undecided on thelong leverage/short leverage issue.The Commission is also adopting two other amendments to Rule 31.11(k) regardingconfirmation statements. These exemptions codify exemptions recently grantedby the Commission in response to petitions received in August 1989, sothe Commission obviously was unable to include these matters in its proposedrule amendments. None of the commenters on the proposals raised these issues.The first amendment relating to confirmation statements concerns the timewithin which such statements must be issued by LTMs. Rules 31.11 (k)(1)and (k)(2) have been amended to require an LTM to issue a confirmationstatement within one business day after the entry into a leverage contractwith a leverage customer, rather than within 24 hours. This change conformsthe requirements for confirmation statements with respect to leverage contractswith similar rules for futures contracts and exchange-traded options. <T3>See</T3> 17 CFR 1.33(b) (1988).The other amendment regarding confirmation statements relates to the noticeregarding rescission rights which apply to a first-time leverage customer.Rules 31.11 (k)(1)(i) and (k)(2)(i) have been amended to require such anotice only in the confirmation statement with respect to a leverage customer'sinitial trade or trades. For purposes of identifying a leverage customer'sright to rescind, the Commission considers all leverage contracts enteredinto by a leverage customer on the same day as the first contract to beincluded in the first transaction and therefore subject to rescission.49 FR 5498, 5509 n.27 (February 13, 1984). The Commission, of course, hasno objection if an LTM wishes to include the notice regarding rescissionin all confirmation statements issued with respect to transactions otherthan the initial opening trade or trades. The Commission believes thatthe wording of the notice regarding rescission rights makes clear thatsuch rights apply only to a first-time leverage customer. The Commissionalso wishes to emphasize that all LTMs have the burden of demonstratingthat each first-time leverage customer has received the appropriate rescissionnotice.I. Monthly Reports of LTMsRule 31.16 requires each LTM to file a written report each month statingthe total number of open leverage contracts as of the end of the monthand the total number of leverage contracts entered into during the month.(These are to be shown separately for all customers and for commercialinterests, but to date no commercial interests have appeared in these reports.)The monthly report must also show the total number of leverage contractsrepurchased, resold, and liquidated by the LTM, as well as the number ofdeliveries and rescissions. The Commission proposed to amend Rule 31.16to require the LTM to file its monthly reports with NFA instead of withthe Commission, in accordance with the instructions and in the format specifiedby NFA. NFA would prepare summaries of these reports for the Commission.\10\<NOTE/> Although one commenter opposed this, stating that the Commissionshould receive the full report from the LTM, the Commission has determinedto adopt the amendment to Rule 31.16 as proposed and has directed NFA toprepare summaries of LTM monthly reports for the Commission.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\10\ As in the case of the amendments to Part 3 of the Commission'srules and other references to applications for LTM or AP of an LTM registration,there is a specific reference to NFA in Rule 31.16. The Commission believesthat this is appropriate because the monthly report data should be centralizedand maintained with a single custodian, even if multiple self-regulatoryorganizations for the leverage business are established.J. Separate LTMEntityThe Commission, as proposed, has retained the substance of Rule 31.22,which prohibits an FCM from offering to enter into, entering into, or confirmingthe execution of, or soliciting or accepting orders for, any leverage contract,and has extended it to include IBs as well.\11\<NOTE/> As noted above, the proviso to Rule 31.22 which applied to``grandfathered'' firms has been deleted since it is no longer relevant.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\11\ One IB responded affirmatively to the leverage survey.Rule 31.22 therefore requires any FCM or IB seeking to enter the leveragebusiness to set up a separate firm to conduct LTM business.\12\<NOTE/> The Commission believes that a separate entity requirementis appropriate based on the disparate nature of the financial requirementsapplicable to FCMs and IBs and LTMs. The Commission also believes thatthis structure is necessary to prevent financial difficulties of the LTMfrom having a direct impact on the adjusted net capital of the FCM or theIB.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\12\ Twenty-one FCMs responded affirmatively to the leveragesurvey.The Commission notes that Rules 3.12(f)(2) (ii) and (iii) and 3.18(f)(1)(ii) and (iii) prohibit an AP from being associated simultaneously withan FCM or IB and an LTM. The Commission further notes, however, that bothRules 3.12 and 3.18, in paragraph (g) of each rule, contain a procedurewhereby any person adversely affected by the operation of each rule canfile a petition for exemption from the requirements of the rule. The Commissionhas previously granted exemptions in this area to the two registered LTMs,each of whom has an affiliated FCM. One commenter would require an LTMto maintain a separate sales force from the FCM or IB. The commenter expressedconcern that dual registration may lead to ``switching hats'' when dealingwith a customer. The Commission has carefully reviewed this comment butit will still consider petitions under Rules 3.12 and 3.18 for dual associationof APs of LTMs and FCMs or IBs and evaluate any such petitions on a case-by-casebasis.K. Petitions for ExemptionThe Commission proposed to delete the specific petition for exemption provisionscurrently set forth in Rule 31.24. One commenter supported this proposal.Another commenter opposed the proposal, stating that such a petition procedureis available in other contexts such as foreign futures and options, dealeroptions and domestic exchange-traded options. This commenter further notedthat if the number of LTMs increases and the metals markets become moreactive than they have been in the last five years, the need for a petitionfor exemption procedure may be greater than it has been under the currentrules.The Commission now has some experience with the rules relating to leveragetransactions and, as noted throughout this document, has codified petitionsfor exemption already granted which are of general applicability. The Commissiontherefore does not believe that it would be necessary or appropriate tomaintain the extremely time-consuming special exemption procedure for anexpanded leverage business. The Commission would expect to see greateruniformity in an expanded leverage business than has been the case withthe ``grandfathered'' firms. The Commission has therefore deleted Rule31.24 as proposed. However, any person involved in the leverage businesswould have whatever petition rights are afforded by the AdministrativeProcedure Act.L. Carrying ChargesThe Commission proposed to amend Rule 31.25(b) regarding carrying chargesto take into account another exemption granted by the Commission. The proposedamendment would permit the compounding of carrying charges on long leveragecontracts, <T3>i.e.</T3>, including in the base upon which carrying charges are assessedpreviously assessed but unpaid carrying charges. If an LTM compounded carryingcharges on long leverage contracts, it would be compelled to pay compoundinterest on short leverage contracts. One commenter opposed this proposedamendment and also made general comments that the rules relating to carryingcharges are too vague. The Commission has carefully considered these commentsand it has determined to adopt the amendment with respect to compoundingof carrying charges as proposed, which codifies a previously granted exemptionand is therefore consistent with current Commission policy. As noted above,Rule 31.25 has also been amended by deleting the reference to leveragecontracts on foreign currencies.M. Quarterly Reporting RequirementRule 31.26 provides that each LTM must file a quarterly report settingforth various information on each leverage contract which was either repurchased,resold or settled by delivery during the quarter, including, with respectto each contract repurchased or resold, the profit or loss incurred bythe leverage customer.\13\<NOTE/> The Commission proposed to amend Rule 31.26 to require anLTM to file its quarterly report with NFA instead of with the Commission,in accordance with the instructions and in the format specified by NFA.NFA would be delegated the function to review and analyze those reports.\14\<NOTE/> The commenter who opposed the Commission's similar proposalwith respect to Rule 31.16 concerning monthly reports also opposed theproposed amendment to Rule 31.26. The Commission has carefully consideredthis comment, has determined to adopt the amendment to Rule 31.26 as proposed,and has directed NFA to prepare summaries of LTM quarterly reports forthe Commission.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\13\ The calculation of the profit or loss incurred on eachclosed-out leverage contract must include, among other things, the carryingcharges associated with each leverage contract. Monex and IPMC were grantedexemptions with respect to this rule so that they only are required toinclude contract-by-contract carrying charges in the profit and loss calculationsfor those contracts which were already open when Rule 31.26 became effectivefrom that point until the contract was closed out, since those firms hadnot previously calculated carrying charges in that manner. Since therewill be no similar problems for new LTMs, the Commission has not amendedRule 31.26 regarding the inclusion of contract-by-contract charges in theprofit and loss calculation. Monex and IPMC will, of course, be permittedto continue to operate pursuant to the exemptions previously granted bythe Commission with respect to Rule 31.26. However, Monex and IPMC willbe required to be in full compliance with Rule 31.26 when the exemptionsare no longer applicable, <T3>i.e.</T3>, after all the pre-1986 leverage contracts are closed out.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\14\ As in the case of the amendments to part 3 of the Commission'srule and other references to applications for LTM or AP of an LTM registration,there is a specific reference to NFA in Rule 31.26. The Commission believesthat this is appropriate because a computerized database would be involved,as in the case of registration, and the data should be centralized andmaintained with a single custodian, even if multiple self-regulatory organizationsfor the leverage business are established.N. Mandatory MembershipThe Commission proposed a new Rule 31.27 to provide that each person requiredto register as an LTM must become and remain a member of a registered futuresassociation which provides for member LTMs, unless no such futures associationis so registered. The Commission viewed this as one of the key provisionsnecessary to establish a regulatory structure for LTMs and APs of LTMssimilar to that for other registrants under the Act, which is direct supervisionby a DSRO under Commission oversight.One commenter suggested, however, that Rule 31.27 regarding mandatory membershipin a registered futures association should require such membership forany firm which is registered as an LTM or is required to register as anLTM, rather than merely for those required to register as an LTM as statedin proposed Rule 31.27. In the commenter's view, this would make clearthat an inactive firm which remained registered as an LTM, even thoughit may not be required to be so registered, must be a member of a registeredfutures association and thus subject to the regulatory jurisdiction ofthe registered futures association. The commenter believes that withoutthe change in the language of Rule 31.27, an inactive registered LTM couldarguably be subject only to the Commission's direct regulatory authority.This would be less efficient than concentrating the direct oversight ofall LTMs in one regulator, <T3>i.e., </T3>a registered futures association, which is a Commissiongoal. The Commission finds merit in this suggestion, and the language ofRule 31.27 has been modified to make clear that any registered LTM, aswell as any firm required to register as an LTM, must be a member of aregistered futures association. Under current conditions, the Commissionanticipates that NFA would have the direct supervisory responsibility forLTMs.O. DSRO PlanThe Commission also proposed to add a new Rule 31.28, which is a counterpartto Rule 1.52 (17 CFR 1.52 (1988)) that is applicable to FCMs and IBs. Themost important provision of Rule 31.28 requires each self-regulatory organizationwith member LTMs to adopt and enforce rules prescribing minimum financial,cover, segregation and sales practice, and related reporting requirementsfor its member LTMs. These self-regulatory organization requirements mustbe the same as, or more stringent than, the rules set forth in Part 31.This rule, taken together with Rule 31.27, form the basis for the self-regulatorystructure of LTMs under Commission oversight.The sales practice requirements of the self-regulatory organization mustencompass several of the Part 31 rules: 31.3 (general antifraud); 31.10(repurchase and resale of leverage contracts by LTMs); 31.11 (disclosureand confirmation statements); 31.14 (recordkeeping); 31.15 (purchase-and-saleand monthly statements to leverage customers); 31.17 (records of leveragetransactions); 31.18 (margin calls); 31.19 (unlawful representations);31.20 (prohibitions of guarantees against loss); and 31.23 (limited rightto rescind first leverage contract). All of these Part 31 rules have remainedunchanged, except for Rule 31.11, as noted above. The self-regulatory organizationis expected to assure that all LTM oral solicitations and promotional materialadequately disclose the risks involved with respect to leverage contracts.The self-regulatory organization is allowed to set its own fees for conductingfinancial and sales practice audits, and the Commission, as proposed, hasdeleted its schedule of fees for audits of LTMs set forth in Appendix Bto Part 31.Rule 31.28 provides for a situation where there is more than one self-regulatoryorganization for LTMs. If such a situation arises, which the Commissiondoes not presently foresee, the self-regulatory organizations could developa joint auditing arrangement to provide for a DSRO to conduct the auditingand monitoring for compliance with minimum financial, cover, segregationand sales practice, and related reporting requirements. These provisionsare also modelled on those in Rule 1.52 applicable to DSRO plans for FCMsand IBs.Two commenters expressed concern that Rule 31.28 could impose obligationson contract markets to regulate leverage transactions. Rule 31.28 doesnot impose such obligations, but only requires that if a self-regulatoryorganization establishes a membership category for LTMs, it must then alsoestablish an appropriate self-regulatory program. However, Rule 31.27 requiresregistered LTMs and those required to register as LTMs to become membersonly of a registered futures association, not a contract market. The Commissionthus anticipates, as it has noted throughout this release, in the releaseannouncing the proposal of these amendments, and in the releases effectingthe transfer of LTM and AP of an LTM registration processing to NFA, thatthe regulatory structure for LTMs will consist of direct regulation byNFA under Commission oversight. <T3>See </T3>54 FR 3476, 3477andamp;n.2, 3479, 3480, 3481 (January 24, 1989);54 FR 19556 (May 8, 1989); and 54 FR 19594 (May 8, 1989).The Commission's intention in structuring Rule 31.28 as it did was to trackRule 1.52 which is applicable to FCMs and IBs, as noted above. When theCommission proposed rules for IBs, it assumed that only NFA would conductfinancial surveillance of IBs, and Rule 1.52 was proposed to be amendedaccordingly. One contract market which commented on the proposed IB rulesurged the Commission to make it clear that contract markets may, in theirdiscretion, adopt financial and reporting requirements for IB members ofcontract markets. The Commission adopted that suggestion. 48 FR 35248,35263-64 (August 3, 1983). To date, however, no contract market has establisheda membership category for IBs and NFA is the only self-regulatory organizationwith such a membership category and with a direct regulatory program forIBs. The Commission therefore anticipates that, although it has allowedcontract markets in their discretion to establish a membership categoryand regulatory program for LTMs, only NFA will have such a membership categoryand regulatory program, as is the case for IBs.One commenter expressed concern that transferring the regulatory burdenwith respect to leverage transactions from the Commission to NFA wouldplace added strain on one of the futures industry's self-regulatory mechanismsat a time when the adequacy of these mechanisms may be called into question.This commenter stated that the Commission should make clear that the firmsengaged in leverage transactions must bear the cost of their regulationand that NFA should not use funds accumulated from futures-related activitiesto finance regulation of leverage transactions. As referred to above, theCommission has deleted its schedule of fees for audits of LTMs and itsregistration fees for LTMs and APs of LTMs. 54 FR 19556, 19557 (May 8,1989). NFA has established its own fee structures in these areas and theCommission trusts NFA has adequately provided resources for its new responsibilities.Another commenter requested the Commission to confirm that NFA's actionwith respect to LTMs will be subject to oversight and review by the Commissionunder Section 17 of the Act, and also urged the Commission to carefullymonitor NFA's enforcement of rules with respect to LTMs. NFA's regulationof leverage transactions is subject to Commission oversight under Section19 of the Act as well as under Section 17 of the Act. The Commission takesits oversight responsibility in this area, as is the case with its oversightof contract markets, very seriously. The Commission has carefully consideredall comments on Rule 31.28, including one submitted by a commenter thatgenerally opposed transferring direct regulatory authority to NFA, andhas determined to adopt Rule 31.28 as proposed.P. ArbitrationThe third new rule which the Commission proposed is Rule 31.29. The rulerequires each self-regulatory organization with member LTMs to providean arbitration or other dispute settlement procedure consistent with thestandards set forth in Part 180 of the Commission's rules. The two commentersthat expressed concern with respect to Rule 31.28 imposing obligationson contract markets expressed similar concerns about Rule 31.29. For thereasons discussed in the preceding section, the Commission again reiteratesthat these rules impose no obligations on contract markets.One commenter expressed opposition to pre-dispute arbitration agreementsin general. In this commenter's view, the customer should have the optionof choosing arbitration after a dispute arises but should never be compelledto do so. The commenter also stated that arbitration should not be permittedfor leverage customer disputes; the customer should use the reparationsforum instead, so that a record may be kept of the incidence of complaints.The Commission has carefully considered this comment and has determinedto adopt Rule 31.29 as proposed.<ITAG tagnum="84">III. Related Matters</ITAG>A. Paperwork Reduction ActThe Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980 (``PRA''), 44 U.S.C. 3501 <T3>et seq.</T3> (1982), imposes certain requirements on federal agencies,including the Commission, in connection with their conducting or sponsoringany collection of information as defined by the PRA. In compliance withthe PRA, the Commission previously submitted these rule amendments in proposedform, and their associated information collection requirements, to theOffice of Management and Budget (``OMB''). OMB approved the collectionof information associated with these rule amendments on April 12, 1989and assigned OMB control number 3038-0029 to these rules. The burden associatedwith this entire collection including these rules amendments, is as follows:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,p0,7/8,g1,t1,i1,s20,xs72</C> <H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Average Burden Hours Per Response<D>48.004845.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Number of Respondents <D>24.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Total Burden Hours<D>9,726.10.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Frequency of response <D>Daily, weekly, quarterly and annually.</D></ITAG></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Copies of the OMB approved information collection package associatedwith these rules may be obtained from Gary Waxman, Office of Managementand Budget, Room 3220, NEOB, Washington, DC 20503, (202) 395-7340.B. Regulatory Flexibility ActThe Regulatory Flexibility Act (``RFA''), 5 U.S.C. 601 <T3>et seq.</T3> (1982), requires that agencies, in proposing rules, considerthe impact of those rules on small businesses. The rule amendments beingproposed herein would affect LTMs. The Commission has previously determinedthat with respect to FCMs based upon the fiduciary nature of FCM/customerrelationships, as well as the requirements that FCMs meet minimum financialrequirements, FCMs should be excluded from the definition of a small entity.\15\<NOTE/> Since LTMs have a somewhat similar relationship with theircustomers as to FCMs, and since LTMs have a higher minimum financial requirementthan FCMs, LTMs should likewise be excluded from the definition of a smallentity. Thererfore, the Chairman, on behalf of the Commission, hereby certifies,pursuant to 5 U.S.C. 605(b), that the action taken herein will not havea significant economic impact on a substantial number of small entities.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\15\ <T3>See</T3> 47 FR 18618, 18619 (April 30, 1982).<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects</ITAG>17 CFR Part 1Reporting and recordkeeping requirements.17 CFR Part 3Reporting and recordkeeping requirements, Registration.17 CFR Part 31Gold, Silver, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements, Leverage transactions.17 CFR Part 145Freedom of information, Commission records.17 CFR Part 147Sunshine Act, Commission records.In consideration of the foregoing, and pursuant to the authority containedin sections 8a(5) and 19 of the Commodity Exchange Act, as amended, 7 U.S.C.12a(5) and 23 (1982 andamp; Supp. IV 1986), and pursuant to the authoritycontained in 5 U.S.C. 552 and 552b (1982), the Commission hereby proposedto amend chapter I of title 17 of the Code of Federal Regulations as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 1_GENERAL REGULATIONS UNDER THE COMMODITY EXCHANGE ACT </ITAG>1. The authority citation for part 1 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sections 2(a)(1), 4, 4a, 4b, 4c, 4d, 4e, 4f, 4g, 4h,4i, 4k, 4m, 4n, 4o, 5, 5a, 6(a), 6(b), 6b, 6c, 8, 8a, 8c, 12, 15, 17, 19and 20 of the Commodity Exchange Act, 7 U.S.C. 2, 2a, 4, 6, 6a, 6b, 6c,6d, 6e, 6f, 6g, 6h, 6i, 6j 6k, 6l, 6m, 6n, 6o, 7, 7a, 8, 9, 12, 12a, 12c,13a, 13a-1, 16, 19, 21, 23 and 24.</ITAG>2. Section 1.3 is amended by revising paragraph (ff) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="86">andSection; 1.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(ff) <T3>Designated self-regulatory organization. </T3>This term means:(1) self-regulatory organization of which a futures commission merchant,an introducing broker or a leverage transaction merchant is a member; or(2) If a futures commission merchant or an introducing broker is a memberof more than one self-regulatory organization and such futures commissionmerchant or introducing broker is the subject of an approved plan underandSection; 1.52 of this part, then a self-regulatory organization delegatedthe responsibility by such a plan for monitoring and auditing such futurescommission merchant or introducing broker for compliance with the minimumfinancial and related reporting requirements of the self-regulatory organizationsof which the futures commission merchant or introducing broker is a member,and for receiving the financial reports necessitated by such minimum financialand related reporting requirements from such futures commission merchantor introducing broker; or(3) If a leverage transaction merchant is a member of more than one self-regulatoryorganization and such leverage transaction merchant is the subject of anapproved plan under andSection; 31.28 of this chapter, then a self-regulatoryorganization delegated the responsibility by such a plan for monitoringand auditing such leverage transaction merchant for compliance with theminimum financial, cover, segregation and sales practice, and related reportingrequirements of the self-regulatory organizations of which the leveragetransaction merchant is a member, and for receiving the reports necessitatedby such minimum financial, cover, segregation and sales practice, and relatedreporting requirements from such leverage transaction merchant. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 3_REGISTRATION </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_Registration </ITAG>3. The authority citation for part 3 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>7 U.S.C. 2, 4, 4a, 6c, 6d, 6e, 6f, 6k, 6m, 6n, 6p,12a, 13c, 16a, and 23 unless otherwise noted. </ITAG>4. Section 3.33 is amended by revising paragraphs (a) introductory text,(b) introductory text, (e), and (f) introductory text to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 3.33</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Withdrawal from registration.</ITAG>(a) A registrant may request that its registration in one or more capacitiesbe withdrawn in accordance with the requirements of this section if:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) A request for withdrawal from registration under this section mustbe made on a Form 7-W completed and filed with the National Futures Associationin accordance with the instructions thereto. The request for withdrawalmust be made by the sole proprietor if the registrant is a sole proprietorship,by a general partner if a partnership, or by the president or chief executiveofficer if a corporation, and must specify:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(e) A request for withdrawal from registration as a futures commissionmerchant, introducing broker, commodity trading advisor, commodity pooloperator or leverage transaction merchant must be sent to the NationalFutures Association, Registration Office, 200 West Madison Street, Chicago,Illinois 60606 and a copy of such request must be sent by the registrant,and by the National Futures Association within three business days of thereceipt of such withdrawal request, to the Commodity Futures Trading Commission,Division of Trading and Markets, Registration Unit, 2033 K Street, NW.,Washington, DC 20581. Within three business days of any determination bythe National Futures Association under andSection;andSection; 3.10(d), 3.13(c),3.14(c), 3.15(c) or 3.17(c) of this part to treat the failure by a registrantto file an annual For 7-R as a request for withdrawal, the National FuturesAssociation shall send the Commission notice of that determination. (f) Except as otherwise provided in andSection;andSection; 3.10(d), 3.13(c),3.14(c), 3.15(c) and 3.17(c) of this part, a request for withdrawal fromregistration will become effective on the thirtieth day after receipt ofsuch request by the National Futures Association, or earlier upon writtennotice from the National Futures Association (with the written concurrenceof the Commission) of the granting of such request, unless prior to theeffective date:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 31_LEVERAGE TRANSACTIONS </ITAG>5. The authority citation for part 31 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>7 U.S.C. 12a and 23, unless otherwise noted. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 31.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed and reserved]</ITAG>6. Section 31.1 is removed and reserved. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 31.2 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed and reserved] </ITAG>7. Section 31.2 is removed and reserved.8. Section 31.4 is amended by revising paragraph (g) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 31.4 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(g) ``Leverage commodity'' means a commodity (gold bullion, silver bullion,bulk gold coins, bulk silver coins, or platinum) which is the subject ofa leverage contract offered for purchase or sale, or purchased or sold,by a particular leverage transaction merchant, the value of which is reflectedin a widely accepted and broadly disseminated commercial or retail cashprice series for cash market transactions, which price series reasonablyreflects the price for the leverage commodity which the customer can expectto pay or receive in normal commercial or retail market channels, including,if applicable, specified premiums or discounts; each leverage commodityis defined by reference to the following distinguishing characteristics:(1) The nominal size, composition and tolerable ranges of the deliverypack or the actual size, composition and tolerable range of the componentof the delivery pack; (2) Minimum guaranteed quality, deliverable countries of origin, deliverablemarkings or imprints, and deliverable refiners or mints; (3) The method of pricing; and(4) The delivery specifications or alternatives including type and locationof delivery facilities, packaging, transportation, registration and associatedcosts.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>9. Section 31.5 is amended by revising paragraph (a) introductory textand paragraph (b), by removing paragraphs (c), (d), (e) and (g), by addinga new paragraph (c) and by redesignating paragraph (f) as paragraph (d)to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 31.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Unlawful conduct.</ITAG>(a) On and after April 13, 1984, it shall be unlawful for any person:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) On and after April 13, 1984, it shall be unlawful for any leveragetransaction merchant to permit any natural person to become or remain associatedwith it as a partner, officer or employee (or in any similar status orposition involving similar functions) in any capacity which involves theoffering to enter into, the entry into, or the confirmation of the executionof a leverage contract with a leverage customer, or the solicitation oracceptance of a leverage customer's order (other than in a clerical capacity)for a leverage contract, or the supervision of any person or persons soengaged, if the leverage transaction merchant knew or should have knownthat the person was not registered with the Commission in accordance withandSection; 3.18 of this chapter or that the person's registration had expired,been suspended (and the period of suspension had not expired) or been revoked.(c) On and after November 10, 1986, it shall be unlawful for any personto offer to enter into, enter into or confirm the execution of a leveragecontract to or with a leverage customer, or to solicit or accept a leveragecustomer's order for a leverage contract, or to accept any leverage customerfunds from a leverage customer to enter into or maintain a leverage contract,unless the leverage commodity which is the subject of the leverage contracthas been registered with the Commission in accordance with andSection; 31.6of this part and involves silver bullion, gold bullion, bulk silver coins,bulk gold coins, or platinum. This paragraph shall not affect any rightsor obligations arising out of any leverage contract involving any otherleverage commodity that was entered into, or the execution of which wasconfirmed, before November 10, 1986.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>10. Section 31.6 is amended by revising paragraphs (a)(1), (a)(4) and (a)(5),by adding a new paragraph (a)(6) and by revising paragraph (b)(1) to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 31.6 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Registration of leverage commodities.</ITAG>(a) * * *(1) The person requesting registration of a leverage commodity is a registeredleverage transaction merchant; <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(4) The commodity can be readily purchased or sold in normal commercialor retail channels by leverage customers making or taking delivery on aleverage contract;(5) The terms and conditions of the leverage contracts based on the leveragecommodity are consistent with the Act and the regulations thereunder, andare not contrary to the public interest; and(6) The terms and conditions of the leverage contracts based on the leveragecommodity do not include substantial characteristics of other interests,such as options, certificates of deposit, or other regulated instruments.(b) * * *(1) Provide evidence that the person applying for registration of the leveragecommodity is registered or has applied to the National Futures Associationfor registration as a leverage transaction merchant;<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>11. Section 31.7 is amended by revising paragraph (c) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 31.7 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Maintenance of minimum financial, cover and segregation requirementsby leverage transaction merchants.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) The requirements of andSection;andSection; 1.12(c), 1.12(d), 1.12(e) and1.12(g) of this chapter shall apply to registered leverage transactionmerchants and to persons who have applied for registration as leveragetransaction merchants, as if in those paragraphs the term ``leverage transactionmerchant or applicant therefor'' were substituted for the phrase ``applicantor registrant.'' 12. Section 31.8 is amended by revising paragraph (a)(2)(ii), by redesignatingparagraphs (a)(2)(iii)(A) and (a)(2)(iii)(B) as paragraphs (a)(2)(v)(A)and (a)(2)(v)(B), by adding new paragraphs (a)(2)(iii) and (a)(2)(iv),and by revising paragraphs (b) and (e) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 31.8 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Cover of leverage contracts.</ITAG>(a) * * *(2) * * *(ii) Warehouse receipts for gold bullion in the case of leverage contractson bulk gold coins, bulk gold coins in the case of leverage contracts ongold bullion, silver bullion in the case of leverage contracts on bulksilver coins, bulk silver coins in the case of leverage contracts on silverbullion, one type of bulk gold coins for leverage contracts involving anothertype of bulk gold coins on an ounce-for-ounce basis if each type of bulkgold coins used as cover is the subject of a leverage contract offeredby the leverage transaction merchant pursuant to registration under andSection;31.6 of this part, and one type of bulk silver coins for leverage contractsinvolving another type of bulk silver coins on an ounce-for-ounce basisif each type of bulk silver coins used as cover is the subject of a leveragecontract offered by the leverage transaction merchant pursuant to registrationunder andSection; 31.6 of this part, which are held in commercial banks locatedin the United States or in approved contract market depositories: <T3>Provided,</T3> That the balance of the principal and accrued intereston any loans against such warehouse receipts does not exceed 70 percentof the current market value of the commodity for which it represents cover.(iii) Purchase, in physical form, of the leverage commodity subject tothe leverage contract, or of the same alternative commodities providedfor in paragraph (a)(2)(ii) of this section, with settlement within twobusiness days shall be considered permissible cover from the time the purchaseorder is confirmed, even though the leverage transaction merchant doesnot have possession or control of a warehouse receipt until settlement:<T3>Provided, however,</T3> That such purchases are not made from an affiliatedfirm, and such purchases at no time constitute more than 10 percent ofthe amount of physical commodities subject to open long leverage contractsentered into with leverage customers: <T3>And, provided further,</T3> That the leverage transaction merchantmaintains, in accordance with andSection;31.14 of this part, detailed recordsof these transactions which will be subject to inspection, copying andaudit by the Commission and a designated self-regulatory organization.(iv) A long spot futures contract on the leverage commodity subject tothe leverage contract, or of the same alternative commodities providedfor in paragraph (a)(2)(ii) of this section, if the leverage transactionmerchant has stopped a delivery notice which is non-transferable with respectto that futures contract and has otherwise complied with any procedures,including payment, necessary for taking delivery, even though the leveragetransaction merchant does not have possession or control of a warehousereceipt for two business days: <T3>Provided, however,</T3> That the amount of physical commodities subjectto such long spot futures contracts at no time constitutes more than 10percent of the amount of physical commodities subject to open long leveragecontracts entered into with leverage customers: <T3>And, provided further,</T3> That the leverage transaction merchantmaintains, in accordance with andSection;31.14 of this part, detailed recordsof its deliveries on futures contracts, which will be subject to inspection,copying and audit by the Commission and a designated self-regulatory organization.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) Such leverage transaction merchant must be in compliance with paragraph(a) of this section at all times and must be able to demonstrate such complianceto the satisfaction of the Commission and/or the designated self-regulatoryorganization. A leverage transaction merchant who is not in compliancewith paragraph (a) of this section or in unable to demonstrate such compliancemust immediately cease engaging in the business of offering to enter into,entering into, or confirming the execution of, any leverage contract untilsuch time as the leverage transaction merchant is able to demonstrate suchcompliance. Nothing in this paragraph (b) shall be construed as preventingthe Commission or the designated self-regulatory organization from takingaction against a leverage transaction merchant for non-compliance withany of the provisions of this section.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(e) The requirements of paragraphs (a) through (d) of this section shallnot be applicable if the leverage transaction merchant is a member of adesignated self-regulatory organization and conforms to minimum cover standardsand related reporting requirements set by such designated self-regulatoryorganization in its bylaws, rules, regulations or resolutions approvedby the Commission pursuant to section 19 of the Act and andSection;31.28of this part.13. Section 31.9 is amended by revising paragraphs (a)(2), (a)(4) and (d)to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;31.9 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Minimum financial requirements.</ITAG>(a) * * *(2) The requirements of paragraph (a) of this section shall not be applicableif the applicant or registrant is a member of a designated self-regulatoryorganization and conforms to minimum financial standards and related reportingrequirements set by such designated self-regulatory organization in itsbylaws, rules, regulations or resolutions approved by the Commission pursuantto section 19 of the Act and andSection;31.28 of this part.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(4) A leverage transaction merchant who is not in compliance with thissection, or is unable to demonstrate such compliance as required by paragraph(a)(3) of this section, must immediately cease engaging in the businessof offering to enter into, entering into, or confirming the execution of,any leverage contract until such time as the leverage transaction merchantis able to demonstrate such compliance. Nothing in this paragraph shallbe construed as preventing the Commission or the designated self-regulatoryorganization from taking action against a leverage transaction merchantfor non-compliance with any of the provisions of this section. Any leveragetransaction merchant required immediately to cease doing business underthis paragraph shall remain liable on all leverage contracts previouslyentered into until all rights of and obligations owing to the customersthereunder have been fulfilled. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) Each registered leverage transaction merchant, and each person whohas applied for registration as a leverage transaction merchant, must makeand keep as a record in accordance with andSection;31.14 of this part formalcomputations of its adjusted net capital and of its minimum financial requirementspursuant to this section as of the close of business each month. Such computationsmust be completed and made available for inspection by any representativeof the National Futures Association, in the case of an applicant, or ofthe Commission, the designated self-regulatory organization, if any, orthe United States Department of Justice in the case of a registrant, within30 days after the date for which the computations are made, commencingthe first month-end after the date the application for registration isfiled.14. Section 31.11 is amended by revising the first sentence of paragraph(a)(1), paragraphs (a)(2)(ii), (a)(2)(viii), (e), (h), (k)(1) introductorytext, (k)(1)(i) introductory text before bold-face statement, (k)(1)(ii)introductory text, (k)(2) introductory text, (k)(2)(i) introductory textbefore bold-face statement and (k)(2)(ii) introductory text, and by addinga new paragraph (m) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 31.11 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Disclosure. </ITAG>(a) * * * (1) The following bold-face risk disclosure statement in at least ten-pointtype on the first page of the Disclosure Document: <T4>BECAUSE OF THE UNPREDICTABLE NATURE OF THE PRICES OF PRECIOUS AND OTHERMETALS, LEVERAGE CONTRACTS INVOLVE A HIGH DEGREE OF RISK AND ARE NOT SUITABLEFOR MANY MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC. </T4>* * * (2) * * * (ii) The distinguishing characteristics of the contract and of the leveragecommodity, including, in particular, those characteristics of the leveragecommodity enumerated in andSection; 31.4(g)(1)-(4) of this part; <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(viii) A statement to the effect that other persons may be unwilling tobuy from the leverage customer the leverage commodity that is deliverableon the leverage contract without first requiring an inspection or assayat the expense of the leverage customer; a statement to the effect thatthe leverage transaction merchant may be unwilling to accept delivery andpay for such leverage commodity without first requiring an inspection orassay at the expense of the leverage customer; and a description of anyother requirements for the delivery of a leverage commodity by a leveragecustomer to a leverage transaction merchant in connection with a shortleverage contract; <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(e)(1) The leverage transaction merchant must file with the National FuturesAssociation three copies and with the Commission at its Washington, DCheadquarters, Attn: Secretariat, one copy of the document for each leveragecontract that it offers or that it intends to offer not less than 21 calendardays prior to the date the leverage transaction merchant first intendsto furnish the document to a prospective leverage customer. The leveragetransaction merchant must specify with the filing the date it first intendsto deliver the document to a prospective leverage customer; (2) Submit to paragraphs (h) and (m) of this section, the leverage transactionmerchant must file with the National Futures Association three copies andwith the Commission at its Washington, D.C. headquarters, Attn: Secretariat,one copy of all subsequent amendments to the document for each leveragecontract that it offers or that it intends to offer within 30 calendardays after the date upon which the leverage transaction merchant firstknows or has reason to know of the defect requiring the amendment. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(h) A leverage transaction merchant must transmit a notification to eachleverage customer within 24 hours of making any change not otherwise permittedunder the contract terms set forth in accordance with paragraph (a)(2)of this section. A notification of any change in the interest rate chargedby the leverage transaction merchant must also be transmitted to each leveragecustomer within twenty-four hours of each change: <T3>Provided, however, </T3>That no notification is required if the changein interest rate is one percent or less as compared to the rate chargedat the prior month-end and the new interest rate is made available to customersby means of a toll-free telephone call, and such availability is set forthin the Disclosure Document. The notification required by this paragraphmust be transmitted by first class mail or other, at least equivalent,means of communication. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(k)(1) Not later than the next business day after the entry into a longleverage contract with a customer, each leverage transaction merchant shallfurnish to such customer, by first-class mail or other, at least equivalent,means of communication, a written Confirmation Statement in a format specifiedby the Commission containing: (i) For a leverage customer's first leverage transaction, the followingbold-faced statement in at least ten-point type: * * * (ii) For every leverage transaction, the following information: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(2) Not later than the next business day after entry into a short leveragecontract with a customer, each leverage transaction merchant shall furnishto such customer by first-class mail or other, at least equivalent, meansof communication, a written Confirmation Statement in a format specifiedby the Commission containing: (i) For a leverage customer's first leverage transaction, the followingbold-faced statement in at least ten-point type: * * * (ii) For every leverage transaction, the following information: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(m)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, if a leveragetransaction merchant is not offering to enter into, entering into or confirmingthe execution of, soliciting or accepting a leverage customer's order for,or accepting any leverage customer funds from a leverage customer to enterinto or maintain any short leverage contract, the leverage transactionmerchant may delete or disregard references to short leverage contractsin its Disclosure Document as follows: (i) The third sentence of the first paragraph of the required bold-facedrisk disclosure statement in paragraph (a)(1) of this section;(ii) The words ``and a short leverage transaction'' in the fourth sentenceof the first paragraph of the required bold-faced risk disclosure statementin paragraph (a)(1) of this section;(iii) The words ``and leverage contracts sold to a leverage transactionmerchant are re-established at the then prevailing ask price'' in the fifthsentence of the third paragraph of the required bold-faced risk disclosurestatement in paragraph (a)(1) of this section;(iv) The second sentence of the fifth paragraph of the required bold-facedrisk disclosure statement in paragraph (a)(1) of this section;(v) The words ``or resold to'' in the first sentence of the sixth paragraphof the required bold-faced risk disclosure statement in paragraph (a)(1)of this section;(vi) The words ``or resell,'' ``and must also offer to resell any shortleverage contract previously sold by a leverage customer,'' and ``or short''in the second sentence of the sixth paragraph of the required bold-facedrisk disclosure statement in paragraph (a)(1) of this section;(vii) The words ``or resold'' and ``or resale'' (twice) in paragraph (a)(2)(vii)of this section;(viii) All of the words following the first semicolon in paragraph (a)(2)(viii)of this section;(ix) The words ``and a representative single short leverage contract''in paragraph (a)(3) of this section; and(x) The words ``or short'' in paragraphs (a)(5)(i) and (a)(5)(ii) of thissection.(2) Any leverage transaction merchant using a Disclosure Document thatdeletes or disregards references to short leverage contracts as permittedby paragraph (m)(1) of this section must file, in accordance with the provisionsof paragraph (e)(2) of this section, a new Disclosure Document meetingall of the requirements of paragraphs (a) through (i) of this section atleast 30 calendar days before it begins to offer any short leverage contract.15. Section 31.12 is amended by adding a new paragraph (h) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 31.12</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Segregation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(h) The requirements of paragraphs (a) through (g) of this section shallnot be applicable if the leverage transaction merchant is a member of adesignated self-regulatory organization and conforms to minimum segregationstandards and related reporting requirements set by such designated self-regulatoryorganization in its bylaws, regulations or resolutions approved by theCommission pursuant to section 19 of the Act and andSection; 31.28 of thispart.16. Section 31.13 is amended by revising paragraphs (a) introductory text,(b)(2) and (c), by redesignating paragraphs (f)(3) and (f)(4) as paragraphs(f)(4) and (f)(5), by adding a new paragraph (f)(3), and by revising paragraphs(g)(2), (j), (k), (l)(1) introductory text, (l)(1)(vii), (l)(2), (l)(3),and (m) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 31.13</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Financial reports of leverage transaction merchants.</ITAG>(a) Each leverage transaction merchant who files an application for registrationwith the National Futures Association under andSection; 3.17 of this chaptershall submit concurrently with the filing of such application either:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) * * *(2) The provisions of paragraph (b)(1) of this section may be met by anyperson registered as a leverage transaction merchant who is a member ofa designated self-regulatory organization and conforms to minimum financialstandards and related reporting requirements set by such designated self-regulatoryorganization in its bylaws, rules, regulations, or resolutions and approvedafter April 13, 1984, by the Commission pursuant to section 19 of the Actand andSection; 31.28 of this part: <T3>Provided, however, </T3>That each such registrant shall promptly filewith the Commission a true and exact copy of each financial report whichit files with such designated self-regulatory organization.(c) Each Form 2-FR which must be certified by an independent public accountantin accordance with the provisions of paragraphs (a)(1), (a)(2) and (b)(1)of this section, must be certified in accordance with andSection; 1.16 ofthis chapter, and must be accompanied by the accountant's report on materialinadequacies in accordance with the provisions of andSection; 1.16(c)(5)of this chapter. In all other respects, the independent public accountantshall act in accordance with the provisions of andSection; 1.16 (except paragraph(f)) of this chapter: <T3>Provided, however, </T3>That the term ``Form 2-FR'' shall be substitutedfor ``Form 1-FR'' in andSection; 1.16(c)(5) of this chapter, the term ``andSection;31.9'' shall be substituted for the term ``andSection; 1.17,'' the term ``leveragetransaction merchant'' shall be substituted for the term ``futures commissionmerchant,'' and ``the segregation requirements of andSection; 31.12'' shallbe substituted for ``the segregation requirements of section 4d(2) of theAct and these regulations and the secured amount requirement of the Actand these regulations.''<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(f) * * *(3) A statement of changes in liabilities subordinated to claims of generalcreditors for the period between the date of the most recent statementof financial condition filed with the Commission and the date for whichthe report is made;<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(g) * * *(2) Statements of: income (loss); cash flows; changes in ownership equity;and changes in liabilities subordinated to claims of general creditors,for the period between the date of the most recent statement of financialcondition filed with the Commission and the date for which the report ismade: <T3>Provided, however, </T3>That for an applicant filing pursuant to paragraph(a) of this section, the period must be the year ending as of the dateof the statement of financial condition;<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(j) Any leverage transaction merchant wishing to establish a fiscal yearother than the calendar year may do so by notifying the National FuturesAssociation of its election of such fiscal year in writing, concurrentlywith the filing of Form 2-FR pursuant to paragraph (a) of this section,but in no event may such fiscal year end more than one year from the dateof the Form 2-FR filed pursuant to paragraph (a) of this section. A leveragetransaction merchant which does not so notify the National Futures Associationwill be deemed to have elected the calendar year as its fiscal year. Aleverage transaction merchant must continue to use its elected fiscal year,calendar or otherwise, unless a change in such fiscal year is approvedupon written application to the designated self-regulatory organization.(k) In the event any leverage transaction merchant finds that it cannotfile its report for any period within the time specified in paragraphs(b) or (d) of this section without substantial undue hardship, it may filewith the designated self-regulatory organization an application for anextension of time to a specified date which may not be more than 90 daysafter the date as of which the financial report was to have been filed.The application must state the reasons for the requested extension andmust contain an agreement to file the report on or before the specifieddate. The application must be received by the designated self-regulatoryorganization before the time specified in paragraphs (b) or (d) of thissection for filing the report. Within 10 calendar days after receipt ofthe application for an extension of time, the designated self-regulatoryorganization shall: (1) Notify the leverage transaction merchant of thegrant or denial of the requested extension; or (2) indicate that additionaltime is required to analyze the request, in which case the amount of timeneeded will be specified.(l)(1) In the event a leverage transaction merchant finds that it cannotfile its certified financial report and schedules for any year within thetime specified in paragraph (b) of this section without substantial unduehardship, it may file with the designated self-regulatory organizationan application for an extension of time to a specified date not more than90 days after the date as of which the certified financial report and scheduleswere to have been filed. The application must be submitted by the leveragetransaction merchant and must:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(vii) Be received by the designated self-regulatory organization priorto the date on which the report is due; and<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(2) Within 10 calendar days after receipt of an application for extensionof time, the designated self-regulatory organization shall: (i) Notifythe leverage transaction merchant of the grant or denial of the requestedextension; or (ii) indicate that additional time is required to analyzethe request, in which case the amount of time needed will be specified.(3) On the written request of a leverage transaction merchant, or on itsown motion, the designated self-regulatory organization may grant an extensionof time or an exemption from any of the certified financial reporting requirementsof this section either unconditionally or on specified terms and conditions.(m) All of the Forms 2-FR filed pursuant to this section will be public:<T3>Provided, however</T3>, That if the statement of financial condition,the computation of the minimum capital requirements pursuant to andSection;31.9 of this part, the schedule of coverage requirements and cover provided,and the schedule of segregation requirements and funds on deposit in segregationare bound separately from the other financial statements (including thestatement of income (loss)), footnote disclosures and schedules of Form2-FR, trade secrets and certain other commercial or financial informationon such other statements and schedules, then such other statements andschedules will be treated as nonpublic for purposes of the Freedom of InformationAct and the Government in the Sunshine Act and Parts 145 and 147 of thischapter. All information on such other statements, footnote disclosuresand schedules will, however, be available for official use by any officialor employee of the United States or any State, by any self-regulatory organizationof which the person filing such report is a member, by the National FuturesAssociation in the case of an applicant, and by any other person to whomthe Commission believes disclosure of such information is in the publicinterest. The independent public accountant's opinion filed pursuant tothis section will be deemed to be public information.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>17. Section 31.16 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 31.16</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Monthly reporting requirements.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Monthly activity. </T3>Each leverage transaction merchant shall filewritten monthly reports with the National Futures Association in the formatspecified by the National Futures Association, by the tenth business dayof the month following the month covered by the report and shall includethe following information separately for each leverage commodity and eachlong and short leverage contract:(1) The total number of leverage contracts that are open as of the closeof business on the last business day of the month for:(i) All customer accounts, and(ii) Separately for commercial leverage accounts.(2) The total number of leverage contracts entered into by leverage customersduring the month for:(i) All customer accounts, and(ii) Separately for commercial leverage accounts.(3) The total number of leverage contracts which were repurchased or resoldby the leverage transaction merchant during the month.(4) The total number of leverage contracts which were liquidated by theleverage transaction merchant during the month (<T3>i.e.,</T3> as a result of overdue or unanswered margin calls).(5) The total number of deliveries on leverage contracts during the month.(6) The total number of leverage contracts which were rescinded duringthe month.(b) <T3>Prices. </T3>The monthly report shall also show the following informationseparately for each leverage commodity and each long and short leveragecontract: the leverage transaction merchant's last bid price offered andlast ask price offered as of the close of business on each business day.18. Section 31.21 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 31.21</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Leverage contracts entered into prior to April 13, 1984; subsequenttransactions.</ITAG>Nothing contained in these regulations shall be construed to affect anylawful activities that occurred prior to April 13, 1984. All leverage contractsoffered or entered into on or after April 13, 1984 shall be subject tothe terms and conditions of these regulations.19. Section 31.22 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 31.22</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prohibited trading in leverage contracts.</ITAG>No futures commission merchant or introducing broker shall offer to enterinto, enter into, confirm the execution of, or solicit or accept ordersfor any leverage contract.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 31.24</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed and reserved]</ITAG>20. Section 31.24 is removed and reserved.21. Section 31.25 is amended by revising paragraph (b) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 31.25</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Bid and ask prices; carrying charges.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) A leverage transaction merchant must apply a carrying charge rate ona short leverage contract that is within one percent per annum of the carryingcharge rate that it applies to a long leverage contract. In the case ofa short leverage contract, the leverage customer must be credited withcarrying charges computed on the total initial value of the contract, usingthe bid price when the contract was executed, plus any margin depositsmade by the leverage customer in connection with the contract, and thesame carrying charge rate must be applied to the total initial value ofthe contract and to the margin deposits. In the case of a long leveragecontract, the leverage customer must be assessed carrying charges onlyon the unpaid balance of the contract, which is the total initial valueof the contract, using the ask price when the contract was executed, minusany margin deposits made in connection with the contract: <T3>Provided, however, </T3>That in the case of a long leverage contract,interest on unpaid carrying charges may be assessed at the same rate asthe interest rate component of the carrying charges and, if such an assessmentwere made and if the leverage transaction merchant offers short leveragecontracts, payment of interest on carrying charges that have been creditedto the leverage customer's account and not withdrawn must be made at thesame rate as the interest rate component of the carrying charges.22. Section 31.26 is amended by removing paragraph (b) and the designationfor paragraph (a), redesignating former paragraphs (a) (1) through (12)as paragraphs (a) through (l), and by revising the introductory text, toread as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 31.26</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Quarterly reporting requirement.</ITAG>Each leverage transaction merchant must file, in accordance with the instructionsof, and in the format specified by, the National Furtures Association aquarterly report with the National Futures Association by the fifteenthbusiness day of the month following the quarter covered by the report.The report must list all leverage contracts which were either repurchased,resold, liquidated or settled by delivery by or to the leverage transactionmerchant during the quarter and, with respect to each leverage contract,must include the following information:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>23. Section 31.27 is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 31.27</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Registered futures association membership.</ITAG>Each person registered or required to register as a leverage transactionmerchant must become and remain a member of at least one futures associationwhich is registered under section 17 of the Act and which provides forthe membership therein of such leverage transaction merchant, unless nosuch futures association is so registered.24. Section 31.28 is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 31.28</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Self-regulatory organization adoption and surveillance of minimumfinancial, cover, segregation and sales practice requirements.</ITAG>(a) Each self-regulatory organization must adopt, and submit for Commissionapproval, rules prescribing minimum financial, cover, segregation and salespractice, and related reporting requirements for all its members who areregistered leverage transaction merchants. Each self-regulatory organizationshall submit for Commission approval any modification or other amendmentsto such rules. Such requirements must be the same as, or more stringentthan, those contained in this part 31 and the definition of adjusted netcapital must be the same as that prescribed in andSection; 31.9(b)(4) ofthis part.(b) Each self-regulatory organization which has members who are registeredleverage transaction merchants shall have in effect and enforce rules submittedto the Commission pursuant to paragraph (a) of this section and approvedby the Commission.(c) Any two or more self-regulatory organizations may file with the Commissiona plan for delegating to a designated self-regulatory organization, forany registered leverage transaction merchant which is a member of morethan one such self-regulatory organization, the responsibility of:(1) Monitoring and auditing for compliance with the minimum financial,cover, segregation and sales practice, and related reporting requirementsadopted by such self-regulatory organizations in accordance with paragraph(a) of this section; and(2) Receiving the reports necessitated by such minimum financial, cover,segregation and sales practice, and related reporting requirements. (d) Any plan filed under this section may contain provisions for the allocationof expenses reasonably incurred by the designated self-regulatory organizationamong the self-regulatory organizations participating in such a plan.(e) A plan's designated self-regulatory organization must report to thatplan's other self-regulatory organizations any violation of such otherself-regulatory organizations' rules and regulations for which the responsibilityto monitor, audit or examine has been delegated to such designated self-regulatoryorganization under this section.(f) The self-regulatory organizations may, among themselves, establishprograms to provide access to any necessary information.(g) After appropriate notice and opportunity for comment, the Commissionmay, by written notice, approve such a plan, or any part of the plan, ifit finds that the plan, or any part of it:(1) Is necessary or appropriate to serve the public interest;(2) Is for the protection and in the interest of leverage customers;(3) Reduces multiple monitoring and auditing for compliance with the minimumfinancial, cover, segregation and sales practice, and related reportingrequirements of the self-regulatory organizations submitting the plan forany leverage transaction merchant which is a member of more than one self-regulatoryorganization;(4) Reduces multiple reporting of the information necessitated by suchminimum financial, cover, segregation and sales practice, and related reportingrequirements by any leverage transaction merchant which is a member ofmore than one self-regulatory organization;(5) Fosters cooperation and coordination among the self-regulatory organizations;and(6) Does not hinder the development of a registered futures associationunder Section 17 of the Act.(h) After the Commission has approved a plan or part of one under paragraph(g) of this section, a self-regulatory organization relieved of responsibilitymust notify each of its members which is subject to such a plan:(1) Of the limited nature of its responsibility for such a member's compliancewith its minimum financial, cover, segregation and sales practice, andrelated reporting requirements; and(2) Of the identity of the designated self-regulatory organization whichhas been delegated responsibility for such a member.(i) The Commission may at any time, after appropriate notice and opportunityfor hearing, withdraw its approval of any plan or part of one establishedunder this section, if such plan or part of one ceases to effectuate adequatelythe purposes of Section 19 of the Act or of this section.(j) Whenever a registered leverage transaction merchant holding membershipin a self-regulatory organization ceases to be a member in good standingof that self-regulatory organization, such self-regulatory organizationmust, on the same day that event takes place, give telegraphic notice ofthat event to the principal office of the Commission in Washington, D.C.and send a copy of that notification to such leverage transaction merchant.(k) Nothing in this section shall preclude the Commission from examiningany leverage transaction merchant for compliance with the minimum financial,cover, segregation and sales practice, and related reporting requirementsto which such leverage transaction merchant is subject.(l) In the event a plan is not filed and/or approved for each registeredleverage transaction merchant which is a member of more than one self-regulatoryorganization, the Commission may design and, after notice and opportunityfor comment, approve a plan for those leverage transaction merchants whichare not the subject of an approved plan (under paragraph (g) of this section),delegating to a designated self-regulatory organization the responsibilitiesdescribed in paragraph (c) of this section.25. Section 31.29 is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 31.29</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Arbitration or other dispute settlement procedures.</ITAG>Each self-regulatory organization which has members who are registeredas leverage transaction merchants must be able to demonstrate its capabilityto promulgate rules and to conduct proceedings which provide a fair, equitableand expeditious procedure, through arbitration or otherwise, for the voluntarysettlement of a leverage customer's claim or grievance brought againstany member leverage transaction merchant. Such rules shall be consistentwith the rules set forth in Part 180 of this chapter governing contractmarket arbitration and dispute settlement procedures.Appendix B to Part 31_[Removed]26. Appendix B to Part 31 is removed.<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 145_COMMISSION RECORDS AND INFORMATION</ITAG>27. The authority citation for Part 145 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Pub. L. 89-554, 80 Stat. 383, Pub. L. 90-23, 81 Stat.54, Pub. L. 93-502, 88 Stat. 1561-1564 (5 U.S.C. 552); Sec. 101(a), Pub.L. 93-463, 88 Stat. 1389 (7 U.S.C. 4a(j)); Pub. L. 99-570.</ITAG>28. Section 145.5 is amended by revising paragraph (d)(1)(i)(H) to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 145.5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Disclosure of nonpublic records.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) * * *(1) * * *(i) * * *(H) The following portions, and footnote disclosures thereof, of the Form2-FR, provided the procedure set forth in andSection; 31.13(m) of this chapteris followed: The Statement of Income (Loss), the Statement of Cash Flows,the Statement of Changes in Ownership Equity, the Statement of Changesin Liabilities Subordinated to the Claims of General Creditors Pursuantto a Satisfactory Subordination Agreement and the accountant's report onmaterial inadequacies filed under andSection; 1.16(c)(5) of this chapter;<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 147_OPEN COMMISSION MEETINGS</ITAG>29. The authority citation for Part 147 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority </T4>Sec. 3(a), Pub. L. 94-409, 90 Stat. 1241 (5 U.S.C. 552b);Sec. 101(a)(11), Pub. L. 93-463, 88 Stat. 1391 (7 U.S.C. 4a(j)).</ITAG>30. Section 147.3 is amended by revising paragraph (b)(4)(i)(A)(<T3>8</T3>) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 147.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General requirement of open meetings; grounds upon which meetingsmay be closed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) * * *(4) * * *(i) * * *(A) * * *(<T3>8</T3>) The following portions, and footnote disclosures thereof, ofthe Form 2-FR provided the procedure set forth in andSection; 31.13(m) ofthis chapter is followed: The Statement of Income (Loss), the Statementof Cash Flows, the Statement of Changes in Liabilities Subordinated tothe Claims of General Creditors Pursuant to a Satisfactory SubordinationAgreement and the accountant's report on material inadequacies filed underandSection; 1.16(c)(5) of this chapter;<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Issued in Washington, DC on September 29, 1989 by the Commission.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Jean A. Webb,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary of the Commission.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-23452 Filed 10-4-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6351-01-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>